Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB36.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 501-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 501-A. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Enforcement officer." An individual who meets all of the following:(1) Is an individual listed under the term as defined under 71 Pa.C.S. § 5102 (relating to definitions).(2) Is employed by the office.(3) Whose duties include the enforcement or supervision of the powers specified under section 506-A.* * *Section 2. Section 503-A(a)(5) of the act is amended to read:Section 503-A. Powers, purpose and duties.(a) Powers.--The State Inspector General shall have the power to:* * *(5) Select, appoint and employ individuals necessary for carrying out the functions, powers and duties of the office. The employees shall be employed in accordance with current procedures of the Office of Administration and may be assigned by the State Inspector General to a designated executive agency. An enforcement officer shall have the power to carry firearms, concealed or otherwise, in the performance of the enforcement officer's official duties in accordance with section 506-A, and subject to the written policies of the State Inspector General. No enforcement officer shall carry, possess or use a firearm in the performance of that individual's official duties unless the enforcement officer has successfully completed basic firearms training and annual 20250HB0036PN0015 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 firearms training or other similar training as approved by the State Inspector General.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0036PN0015 - 3 - 1234